District of Columbia statutes.
47-1818.05

Council approval of city-wide business activity strategy agreements.

(a)

(1)

Within 180 days of the effective date of this subchapter, the Mayor shall submit each BAS agreement, along with proof of the certification required by § 47-1818.04(a), to the Council for its approval.

(2)

If no proposed resolution of disapproval is filed with the Secretary to the Council within 14 days of the receipt by the Council of the BAS agreement, the BAS agreement shall be deemed approved.

(3)

If a proposed resolution of disapproval is filed with the Secretary to the Council within 14 days of receipt by the Council of the BAS agreement, the Council may approve or disapprove the BAS agreement by resolution within 30 days of the receipt of the BAS agreement. If the Council neither affirmatively approves or disapproves the BAS agreement within 30 days of the receipt by the Council of the BAS agreement, the BAS agreement shall be deemed approved.

(b)

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, an abatement provided pursuant to § 47-1818.02 shall not be contingent upon the Council approval, or disapproval, of the BAS agreement.

Oct. 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-174, § 2, 59 DCR 8712
This section is referenced in § 47-1818.03.